Arkansas, session 2025, HB1886.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 1, Chapter 4 is amended to add an
additional section to read as follows:
1-4-142. State canine.
(a) The labrador retriever is designated as the official canine of the
State of Arkansas.
(b)(1) This section does not require a state agency or office to
republish a publication or brochure to list or display the state canine.
(2) A state agency or office may include information concerning
the state canine in a future publication or brochure or in a scheduled update
to a publication or brochure.

/s/Pearce




*LGL175*
04-09-2025 09:27:08 LGL175